Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.030

Laws applicable to council-manager cities—Civil service.

A city or town organized under the council-manager plan shall have all the powers which cities of its class have and shall be governed by the statutes applicable to such cities to the extent to which they are appropriate and not in conflict with the provisions specifically applicable to cities organized under the council-manager plan.

Any city adopting a council-manager form of government may adopt any system of civil service which would be available to it under any other form of city government. Any state law relative to civil service in cities of the class of a city under the council-manager type of government shall be applicable thereto.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.030. Prior: (i) 1949 c 84 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-33. (ii) 1943 c 271 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-19, part. (iii) 1943 c 271 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-30.]